Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2635.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 3370 of Title 75 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended to read:§ 3370. Automated speed enforcement system on designated highways.(a) [General rule] Establishment of program.--A program is established to provide for an automated speed enforcement system on [U.S. Route 1 (Roosevelt Boulevard) between Ninth Street and the Philadelphia County line shared with Bucks County in a city of the first class. The following shall apply:(1) A city of the first class, upon passage of an ordinance, is authorized to enforce section 3362 (relating to maximum speed limits) on Roosevelt Boulevard by recording 123456789101112131415161718 violations using an automated speed enforcement system approved by the department.(3) A city of the first class may expand the automated speed enforcement system beyond Roosevelt Boulevard to no more than five corridors if the following conditions are met:(i) The city of the first class, in consultation with the department, proposes a new State or local highway corridor within the borders of the city of the first class according to speed data and speed-related accidents involving vehicles or pedestrians. Each proposed corridor must include a beginning segment and an end segment on the same State or local route within the borders of the city of the first class.(ii) The city of the first class conducts an engineering and traffic investigation under section 6109(e) (relating to specific powers of department and local authorities) on the posted speed limit within a proposed State or local highway corridor for an automated speed enforcement system.(iii) The city of the first class provides at least one opportunity for public comment regarding the proposed State or local highway corridor.] designated highways. The following shall apply to the program:(3.1) A municipality, upon passage of an ordinance, is authorized to enforce section 3362 (relating to maximum speed limits) by recording violations using an automated speed enforcement system approved by the department if the following conditions are met:(i) The municipality, in consultation with the department, proposes a new State or local highway 20260HB2635PN3601 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 corridor within the borders of the municipality according to speed data and speed-related accidents involving vehicles or pedestrians. Each proposed corridor must include a beginning segment and an end segment on the same State or local route within the borders of the municipality.(ii) The municipality conducts an engineering and traffic investigation under section 6109(e) (relating to specific powers of department and local authorities) on the posted speed limit within a proposed State or local highway corridor for an automated speed enforcement system.(iii) The municipality provides at least one opportunity for public comment regarding the proposed State or local highway corridor.(4) When the conditions under paragraph [(3)] (3.1) have been met, a [city of the first class] municipality, upon passage of an ordinance for each new corridor, is authorized to enforce section 3362 by recording violations using an automated speed enforcement system approved by the department.(b) Owner liability.--(1) For each violation under this section, the owner of the motor vehicle shall be liable for the penalty imposed unless the owner is convicted of the same violation under another section of this title or has a defense under subsection (g).(2) For the purposes of this section, the lessee of a leased vehicle shall be considered the owner of the motor vehicle.20260HB2635PN3601 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (c) Certificate as evidence.--A certificate, or a facsimile of a certificate, based upon inspection of recorded images produced by an automated speed enforcement system and sworn to or affirmed by a police officer employed by the [city of the first class] police department with primary jurisdiction over the area where the violation occurred shall be prima facie evidence of the facts contained in it. The [city] municipality must include written documentation that the automated speed enforcement system was operating correctly at the time of the alleged violation. A recorded image evidencing a violation of section 3362 shall be admissible in any judicial or administrative proceeding to adjudicate the liability for the violation.(d) Penalty.--[The following shall apply:](1) The penalty for a violation under subsection (a) shall be a fine of $150 unless a lesser amount is set by ordinance. The ordinance may create fines for first offense, second offense and third and subsequent offenses, but no single fine shall exceed $150.(1.1) Beginning the first day of January following the year of the effective date of this paragraph, the maximum amount of the fine in paragraph (1) shall be fixed annually by the department based on the maximum amount in the prior year as adjusted to reflect the change in the Consumer Price Index for All Urban Consumers (CPI-U) for the United States for all items as published by the United States Department of Labor, Bureau of Labor Statistics, for the previous 12-month period. The maximum amount as adjusted shall be rounded to the nearest multiple of $1. The department shall transmit notice of the new maximum amount to the Legislative Reference 20260HB2635PN3601 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Bureau for publication in the next available issue of the Pennsylvania Bulletin. The adjusted maximum amount shall apply to violations occurring after the date of publication of the notice in the Pennsylvania Bulletin.(2) A penalty is authorized only for a violation of this section if each of the following apply:(i) At least two appropriate warning signs are conspicuously placed at the beginning and end and at two-mile intervals of the designated highway notifying the public that an automated speed enforcement system is in use.(ii) A notice identifying the location of the automated speed enforcement system is posted on the [city of the first class's] municipality's or system administrator's publicly accessible Internet website throughout the period of use.(3) A fine is not authorized during the first 30 days of operation of an automated speed enforcement system.(4) The system administrator may provide a written warning to the owner of a motor vehicle determined to have violated this section during the first 30 days of operation of the automated speed enforcement system.(5) A penalty imposed under this section shall not be deemed a criminal conviction and shall not be made part of the operating record under section 1535 (relating to schedule of convictions and points) of the individual upon whom the penalty is imposed, nor may the imposition of the penalty be subject to merit rating for insurance purposes.(6) No surcharge points may be imposed in the provision of motor vehicle insurance coverage. Penalties collected 20260HB2635PN3601 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 under this section shall not be subject to 42 Pa.C.S. § 3571 (relating to Commonwealth portion of fines, etc.) or 3573 (relating to municipal corporation portion of fines, etc.).(7) If a person who has a prior violation of this section before the effective date of this paragraph commits another violation of this section after the effective date of this paragraph, the violation after the effective date of this paragraph shall be deemed a first offense and any violation occurring after that violation shall constitute an additional offense.(e) Liability.--Driving in excess of the posted speed limit along the designated highway by 11 miles per hour or more is a violation of this section.(f) Limitations.--[The following shall apply:](1) No automated speed enforcement system shall be utilized in such a manner as to take a frontal view recorded image of the motor vehicle as evidence of having committed a violation.(2) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, camera equipment deployed as part of an automated speed enforcement system as provided in this section must be incapable of automated or user-controlled remote surveillance by means of recorded video images. Recorded images collected as part of the automated speed enforcement system must only record traffic violations and may not be used for any other surveillance purposes, but may include video of the area enforced when triggered by a violation. The restrictions set forth in this paragraph shall not be deemed to preclude a court of competent jurisdiction from issuing an order directing that the information be provided to law enforcement 20260HB2635PN3601 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 officials if the information is reasonably described and is requested solely in connection with a criminal law enforcement action.(3) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, information prepared under this section and information relating to violations under this section which is kept by the [city of the first class] municipality or system administrator, its authorized agents or its employees, including recorded images, written records, reports or facsimiles, names, addresses, motor vehicle information and the number of violations under this section, shall be for the exclusive use of the [city] municipality, its authorized agents, its employees and law enforcement officials for the purpose of discharging their duties under this section and under any ordinances and resolutions of the [city] municipality. The information shall not be deemed a public record under the act of February 14, 2008 (P.L.6, No.3), known as the Right-to-Know Law. The information shall not be discoverable by court order or otherwise, nor shall it be offered in evidence in any action or proceeding which is not directly related to a violation of this section or any ordinance or resolution of the [city] municipality. The restrictions [set forth] specified in this paragraph shall not be deemed to preclude a court of competent jurisdiction from issuing an order directing that the information be provided to law enforcement officials if the information is reasonably described and is requested solely in connection with a criminal law enforcement action.(4) Recorded images obtained through the use of automated speed enforcement systems deployed as a means of 20260HB2635PN3601 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 promoting traffic safety in a [city of the first class] municipality shall be destroyed within one year of final disposition of any recorded event except that images subject to a court order under paragraph (2) or (3) shall be destroyed within two years after the date of the order, unless further extended by court order. The [city] municipality shall file notice with the department that the records have been destroyed in accordance with this section.(5) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, motor vehicle owner information obtained as a result of the operation of an automated speed enforcement system under this section shall not be the property of the manufacturer or vendor of the automated speed enforcement system and may not be used for any purpose other than as prescribed in this section.(6) An intentional violation of this subsection shall constitute a misdemeanor of the third degree punishable by a $500 fine. Each violation shall constitute a separate and distinct offense.(g) Defenses.--[The following shall apply:](1) It shall be a defense to a violation under this section that the person named in the notice of the violation was not driving the motor vehicle at the time of the violation. The owner of the motor vehicle may be required to submit evidence that the owner was not the driver at the time of the alleged violation. The [city of the first class] municipality may not require the owner of the motor vehicle to disclose the identity of the driver of the motor vehicle at the time of the violation.(2) If an owner of a motor vehicle receives a notice of 20260HB2635PN3601 - 8 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 violation pursuant to this section of a time period during which the motor vehicle was reported to a police department as having been stolen, it shall be a defense to a violation under this section that the motor vehicle has been reported to a police department as stolen prior to the time the violation occurred and had not been recovered prior to that time.(3) It shall be a defense to a violation under this section that the person receiving the notice of violation was not the owner of the motor vehicle at the time of the offense.(4) It shall be a defense to a violation under this section that the automated speed enforcement system being used to determine speed was not in compliance with section 3368 (relating to speed timing devices) with respect to testing for accuracy, certification or calibration.(h) Department approval.--(1) No automated speed enforcement system may be used without the approval of the department, which shall have the authority to promulgate regulations for the certification and use of the systems which regulations may include the use of radio-microwave devices, commonly referred to as electronic speed meters or radar, or light detection and ranging devices, commonly referred to as LIDAR, in their operations.(2) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the devices identified in paragraph (1) shall be tested for accuracy at regular intervals as designated by regulation of the department.(i) Duty of [city.--The following provisions shall apply:] municipality.--20260HB2635PN3601 - 9 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (1) A [city of the first class] municipality may not use an automated speed enforcement system unless there is posted an appropriate sign in a conspicuous place before the area in which the automated speed enforcement system is to be used notifying the public that an automated speed enforcement system is in use immediately ahead.(2) A city of the first class shall designate or appoint the Philadelphia Parking Authority as the system administrator to supervise and coordinate the administration of notices of violation issued under this section. Compensation under a contract authorized by this paragraph shall be based only upon the value of equipment and services provided or rendered in support of the automated speed enforcement system program and may not be based on the quantity of notices of violation issued or amount of fines imposed or generated.(2.1) A municipality, except for a city of the first class as provided under paragraph (2), shall designate or appoint a system administrator to supervise and coordinate the administration of notices of violations issued under this section. Compensation under a contract authorized by this paragraph shall be based only upon the value of equipment and services provided or rendered in support of the automated speed enforcement system program and may not be based on the quantity of notices of violations issued or amount of fines imposed or generated.(3) The system administrator shall prepare a notice of violation to the owner of a motor vehicle identified in a recorded image produced by an automated speed enforcement system as evidence of a violation of section 3362. The notice 20260HB2635PN3601 - 10 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 of violation must be issued by a police officer employed by the police department with primary jurisdiction over the area where the violation occurred. The notice of violation shall [have] include the following [attached to it]:(i) a copy of the recorded image showing the motor vehicle;(ii) the registration number and state of issuance of the motor vehicle registration;(iii) the date, time and place of the alleged violation;(iv) notice that the violation charged is under section 3362; and(v) instructions for return of the notice of violation, which shall read:This notice shall be returned personally, by mail or by an agent duly authorized in writing, within 30 days of issuance. A hearing may be obtained upon the written request of the owner of the motor vehicle.(j) System administrator.--[The following shall apply:](1) The system administrator may hire and designate personnel as necessary or contract for services through a manufacturer or vendor to implement this section.(2) The system administrator shall process notices of violation and penalties issued under this section.(3) Not later than September 1 annually, the system administrator shall [submit an annual report to the chairperson and the minority chairperson of the Transportation Committee of the Senate and the chairperson and minority chairperson of the Transportation Committee of the House of Representatives.] make an annual report 20260HB2635PN3601 - 11 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 available to the public on the municipality's or system administrator's publicly accessible Internet website. The report shall be considered a public record under the Right-to-Know Law and include for the prior year:(i) The number of violations and fines issued and data regarding the speeds of motor vehicles in the enforcement area.(ii) A compilation of penalties paid and outstanding and violations contested.(iii) The amount of money paid to a vendor or manufacturer under this section.(iv) The number of vehicular and pedestrian accidents and related serious bodily injuries and deaths along the designated highway.(k) Notice to owner.--In the case of a violation involving a motor vehicle subject to the laws of this Commonwealth, the notice of violation must be mailed [within] not later than 30 days after the commission of the violation or [within] not later than 30 days after the discovery of the identity of the owner of the motor vehicle, whichever is later, [and not thereafter] to the address of the owner as listed in the records of the department. In the case of motor vehicles from jurisdictions other than this Commonwealth, the notice of violation must be mailed [within] not later than 30 days after the discovery of the identity of the owner to the address of the owner as listed in the records of the official in the jurisdiction having charge of the registration of the motor vehicle. A notice of violation under this section must be provided to the owner of the motor vehicle [within] not later than 90 days [of] after the commission of the offense.20260HB2635PN3601 - 12 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (l) Mailing of notice and records.--Notice of violation must be sent by first class mail. A manual or automatic record of mailing prepared by the system administrator in the ordinary course of business shall be prima facie evidence of mailing and shall be admissible in any judicial or administrative proceeding as to the facts contained in it.(m) Payment of fine.--[The following shall apply:](1) An owner of a motor vehicle to whom a notice of violation has been issued may admit responsibility for the violation and pay the fine provided in the notice.(2) Payment must be made personally, through an authorized agent, electronically or by mailing both payment and the notice of violation to the system administrator. Payment by mail must be made only by money order, credit card or check made payable to the system administrator. The system administrator shall remit the fine, less the system administrator's operation and maintenance costs necessitated by this section, to the department for deposit into a restricted receipts account in the Motor License Fund. Fines deposited in the fund under this paragraph shall be used by the department for a Transportation Enhancement Grants Program as established by section 3116 (relating to automated red light enforcement systems in first class cities). The department shall award transportation enhancement grants on a competitive basis. The department may pay actual administrative costs arising from the department's administration of this section. The department may not reserve, designate or set aside a specific level of funds or percentage of funds to an applicant prior to the completion of the application process, nor may the department designate 20260HB2635PN3601 - 13 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 a set percentage of funds to an applicant. [Grants shall be awarded by the department based on the majority vote of a selection committee consisting of four representatives of the department appointed by the secretary and four members appointed by the mayor of the city of the first class, with the secretary or a designee of the secretary serving as chairperson. Priority shall be given to applications seeking grant funds for transportation enhancements in the municipality where the automated speed camera system is operated.] Grants shall only be awarded by the department to municipalities where an automated speed enforcement system is operated.(3) Payment of the established fine and applicable penalties shall operate as a final disposition of the case.(n) Hearing.--[The following shall apply:](1) An owner of a motor vehicle to whom a notice of violation has been issued may, [within] not later than 30 days [of] after the mailing date of the notice, request a hearing to contest the liability alleged in the notice. A hearing request must be made by appearing before the system administrator during regular office hours either personally or by an authorized agent or by sending a request on the prescribed form.(2) Upon receipt of a hearing request, the system administrator shall in a timely manner schedule the matter before a hearing officer. The hearing officer shall be designated by the [city of the first class] municipality. Written notice of the date, time and place of hearing must be sent by first class mail to the owner of the motor vehicle. A hearing to contest liability may be in person or be conducted 20260HB2635PN3601 - 14 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 through live-stream synchronous video conferencing or similar virtual presence technology and shall be only at the locations and times set by the system administrator.(3) The hearing shall be conducted pursuant to 2 Pa.C.S. Ch. 5 (relating to practice and procedure) and will be subject to appeal pursuant to 2 Pa.C.S. Ch. 7 (relating to judicial review).(o) Compensation to manufacturer or vendor.--If a [city of the first class] municipality has established an automated speed enforcement system, the compensation paid to the manufacturer or vendor of the automated speed enforcement system may not be based upon the number of traffic citations issued or a portion or percentage of the fine generated by the citations. The compensation paid to the manufacturer or vendor of the equipment shall be based upon the value of the equipment and the services provided or rendered in support of the automated speed enforcement system.(p) Revenue limitation.--A [city of the first class] municipality may not collect an amount equal to or greater than 2% of its annual budget from the collection of revenue from the issuance and payment of violations under this section.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260HB2635PN3601 - 15 - 12345678910111213141516171819202122